Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 4. State DNA Database and State Data Bank

§ 1931.
Policy.

It is the policy of this State to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in the identification, detection, or exclusion of individuals who are subjects of the investigation or prosecution of crimes. Identification, detection, and exclusion may be facilitated by the DNA analysis of biological evidence left by the perpetrator of a crime and recovered from the crime scene. The DNA analysis of biological evidence can also be used to identify missing persons.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2009, No. 1

, § 19, eff. March 4, 2009.

§ 1932.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“CODIS” means the FBI’s national DNA identification index system that allows storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by state and local forensic DNA laboratories. The term “CODIS” is derived from Combined DNA Index System.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety.

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid. DNA encodes genetic information that is the basis of human heredity and forensic identification.

“DNA record” means DNA sample identification information stored in the State DNA database or CODIS. A DNA record is the result obtained from the DNA sample typing tests and is referred to as the DNA profile of an individual.

“DNA sample” means a forensic unknown tissue sample or a tissue sample provided by any person convicted of a designated crime. The DNA sample may be blood or other tissue type specified by the Department.

“FBI” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

“Forensic unknown sample” means an unidentified tissue sample gathered in connection with a criminal investigation.

“Laboratory” means the Department of Public Safety Forensic Laboratory. The Laboratory’s general authority under this subchapter includes specifying procedures for collection and storage of DNA samples.

“Population database” means anonymous DNA records used to assist statistical evaluation.

“State DNA database” means the Laboratory DNA identification record system. The State DNA database is a collection of the DNA records related to forensic casework, persons required to provide a DNA sample under this subchapter, and anonymous DNA records used for protocol development or quality control.

“State DNA data bank” means the repository of DNA samples collected and maintained under the provisions of this subchapter.

“Designated crime” means any of the following offenses:

a felony;

13 V.S.A. § 1042

(domestic assault);

any crime for which a person is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3;

13 V.S.A. § 1062

(stalking);

13 V.S.A. § 1025

(reckless endangerment);

a violation of an abuse prevention order as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1030

, excluding violation of an abuse prevention order issued pursuant to

15 V.S.A. § 1104

(emergency relief) or

33 V.S.A. § 6936

(emergency relief);

a misdemeanor violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 28, relating to abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults;

an attempt to commit any offense listed in this subdivision; or

any other offense, if, as part of a plea agreement in an action in which the original charge was a crime listed in this subdivision and probable cause was found by the court, there is a requirement that the defendant submit a DNA sample to the DNA data bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2005, No. 83

, § 7, eff. June 28, 2005;

2009, No. 1

, § 20, eff. March 4, 2009;

2009, No. 1

, § 23, eff. July 1, 2011;

2015, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 23, 2016.

§ 1933.
DNA sample required.

The following persons shall submit a DNA sample:

a person convicted in a court in this State of a designated crime on or after April 29, 1998;

a person who was convicted in a court in this State of a designated crime prior to April 29, 1998 and, after such date, is:

in the custody of the Commissioner of Corrections pursuant to

28 V.S.A. § 701

;

on parole for a designated crime;

serving a supervised community sentence for a designated crime; or

on probation for a designated crime.

A person required to submit a DNA sample who is serving a sentence in a correctional facility shall have his or her DNA samples collected or taken at the receiving correctional facility, or at a place and time designated by the Commissioner of Corrections or by a court, if the person has not previously submitted a DNA sample.

A person serving a sentence for a designated crime not confined to a correctional facility shall have his or her DNA samples collected or taken at a place and time designated by the Commissioner of Corrections, the Commissioner of Public Safety, or a court if the person has not previously submitted a DNA sample in connection with the designated crime for which he or she is serving the sentence.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2005, No. 83

, § 8, eff. June 28, 2005;

2009, No. 1

, § 21, eff. March 4, 2009;

2009, No. 1

, § 24, eff. July 1, 2011;

2015, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 23, 2016.

Particular Cases.

Because defendant, who had been convicted of burglary and three counts of sexual assault in 1990 and who had been incarcerated since 1987, was required to provide a DNA sample to the Department of Corrections (DOC) and there was insufficient evidence that his prior DNA samples, given while he was held in facilities in Minnesota, Florida, and Kentucky, were collected by or at the behest of the DOC, the trial court properly granted the DOC’s motion to compel him to provide a DNA sample. State v. Bruyette, 2021 VT 43, — Vt. —, 257 A.3d 837, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 58 (Vt. 2021).

§ 1934.
Least intrusive means of collection.

The DNA sample shall be obtained by withdrawing blood, unless the Department determines that a less intrusive means to obtain a scientifically reliable sample is available, in which event such less intrusive means shall be used.

For purposes of this subchapter, a blood sample may only be drawn by a physician, physician assistant, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, medical technologist, laboratory assistant, or phlebotomist.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1935.
Procedure if person refuses to give sample.

If a person who is required to provide a DNA sample under this subchapter refuses to provide the sample, the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections or of Public Safety shall file a motion in the Superior Court for an order requiring the person to provide the sample.

The person who refuses to provide a DNA sample shall be served with a copy of the motion and shall be entitled to a hearing by the court, limited in scope solely to the issues described in subsection (c) of this section.

If the court finds that the person who refused to provide a DNA sample is a person required by section 1933 of this subchapter to provide a DNA sample, the court shall issue a written order requiring the person to provide the DNA sample in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter. The court’s order shall also specify the manner by which the DNA sample shall be obtained and may authorize law enforcement and correctional personnel to employ reasonable force to obtain the DNA sample. No such employee or health care professional shall be criminally or civilly liable for the use of reasonable force.

If the court finds that the person who refused to provide a DNA sample is not a person required by section 1933 of this subchapter to provide a DNA sample, the court shall issue a written order relieving the person of the obligation to provide a DNA sample.

If the Supreme Court reverses a determination that a DNA sample shall be provided, the Department shall destroy the DNA sample and expunge the DNA record as provided in section 1940 of this subchapter.

Venue for proceedings under this section shall be in the territorial unit of the Superior Court where the conviction occurred. Hearings under this section shall be conducted by the Superior Court without a jury and shall be subject to the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure as consistent with this section. The State has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence. Affidavits of witnesses shall be admissible evidence that may be rebutted by witnesses called by either party. The affidavits shall be delivered to the other party at least five days prior to the hearing.

A decision of the Superior Court under this section may be appealed as a matter of right to the Supreme Court. The court’s order shall not be stayed pending appeal unless the respondent is reasonably likely to prevail on appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 158.

§ 1936.
Compatibility with national system; authority to enter into DNA
identification index system agreements with state, federal, and foreign jurisdictions.

The DNA database system established by the State shall be compatible with the FBI’s national DNA identification index system currently referred to as CODIS. The State may enter into any agreement with a state, federal, or foreign law enforcement agency that provides for participation in a state, federal, or foreign DNA identification index system, including CODIS, provided that the agreements shall be consistent in all material respects with this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1937.
Authorized analysis of DNA samples.

Analysis of DNA samples is authorized:

to type the genetic markers from DNA samples for law enforcement identification purposes;

if personal identifying information is removed, for protocol development and administrative purposes, including:

development of a population database;

to support identification protocol development of forensic DNA analysis methods; and

for quality control purposes; or

to assist in the identification of human remains.

Analysis of DNA samples obtained pursuant to this subchapter is not authorized for identification of any medical or genetic disorder.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1938.
Storage and use of samples and records.

A DNA sample and a DNA record obtained pursuant to this subchapter shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this subchapter and may be provided to law enforcement agencies for lawful law enforcement purposes.

The tissue, fluid, or other substance from which the DNA is extracted shall be used only for DNA sample analysis authorized in this subchapter and may be provided to law enforcement agencies only for DNA sample analysis for use in any investigation and prosecution.

Only DNA samples shall be stored in the State DNA data bank.

Only DNA records derived from DNA samples shall be stored in the State DNA database.

Except as provided in section 1939 of this chapter, no DNA records derived from DNA samples shall be aggregated or stored in any database, other than CODIS and the State DNA database, that is accessible by any person other than by the Department for the purpose for which the samples were collected.

Except for forensic unknown samples, no samples of tissue, fluid, or other biological substance voluntarily submitted or obtained by the execution of a nontestimonial identification order shall be entered into the State DNA data bank. However, such samples may be used for any other purpose authorized in section 1937 of this subchapter.
(f) (1) Except for forensic unknown samples, no samples of tissue, fluid, or other biological substance voluntarily submitted or obtained by the execution of a nontestimonial identification order shall be entered into the State DNA data bank. However, such samples may be used for any other purpose authorized in section 1937 of this subchapter.

Notwithstanding the prohibition of subdivision (1) of this subsection, any sample that may lead to an exculpatory result shall be used only for the purpose of the criminal investigation and related criminal prosecution for which the samples were obtained. Upon the conclusion of the criminal investigation and finalization of any related criminal prosecution, such samples shall be placed under seal, and shall not be used for any purpose whatsoever, except pursuant to a judicial order for good cause shown.

Notwithstanding the prohibition of subdivision (1) of this subsection, any sample that may lead to an exculpatory result shall be used only for the purpose of the criminal investigation and related criminal prosecution for which the samples were obtained. Upon the conclusion of the criminal investigation and finalization of any related criminal prosecution, the genetic records shall be placed under seal, and shall not be used for any purpose whatsoever, except pursuant to a judicial order for good cause shown.

Except for records obtained from forensic unknown samples, no DNA records of samples of tissue, fluid, or other biological substance that were obtained as the result of either consensual submission of biological evidence or the execution of a nontestimonial identification order shall be entered into the State DNA database.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1939.
Population database.

Only the DNA records derived from the DNA samples obtained under sections 1933 and 1934 of this title, DNA records voluntarily submitted to the population database, and DNA records from population databases in existence on January 1, 1999 may be used to develop a population database after all personal identifying information is removed.

Nothing shall prohibit the laboratory from sharing or disseminating a population database with other law enforcement agencies, crime laboratories that serve them, or other third parties the laboratory deems necessary to assist the laboratory with statistical analysis of the laboratory’s population databases. The population database may be made available to other agencies participating in CODIS.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1940.
Expungement of records and destruction of samples.

In accordance with procedures set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall destroy the DNA sample and any records of a person related to the sample that were taken in connection with a particular alleged designated crime in either of the following circumstances:

A person’s conviction related to an incident that caused the DNA sample to be taken is reversed, and the case is dismissed.

The person is granted a full pardon related to an incident that caused the DNA sample to be taken.

If any of the circumstances in subsection (a) of this section occur, the court with jurisdiction or, as the case may be, the Governor, shall so notify the Department, and the person’s DNA record in the State DNA database and CODIS and the person’s DNA sample in the State DNA data bank shall be removed and destroyed. The Laboratory shall purge the DNA record and all other identifiable information from the State DNA database and CODIS and destroy the DNA sample stored in the State DNA data bank. If the person has more than one entry in the State DNA database, CODIS, or the State DNA data bank, only the entry related to the dismissed case shall be deleted. The Department shall notify the person upon completing its responsibilities under this subsection, by certified mail addressed to the person’s last known address.

If the identity of the subject of a forensic unknown sample becomes known and that subject is excluded as a suspect in the case, the sample record shall be removed from the State DNA database upon the conclusion of the criminal investigation and finalization of any criminal prosecution.

If a DNA sample from the State DNA database, CODIS, or the State DNA data bank is matched to another DNA sample during the course of a criminal investigation, the record of the match shall not be expunged even if the sample itself is expunged in accordance with the provisions of this section. If a match has been made and any of the circumstances in subsection (a) of this section occur, the Department may confirm the match prior to expunging the sample.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2005, No. 83

, § 9, eff. June 28, 2005;

2009, No. 1

, § 22, eff. March 4, 2009;

2009, No. 1

, § 25, eff. July 1, 2011;

2015, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 23, 2016.

§ 1941.
Confidentiality of records.

All DNA samples submitted to the laboratory pursuant to this subchapter shall be confidential.

DNA records shall not be used for any purpose other than as provided in section 1937 of this subchapter, provided that in appropriate circumstances such records may be used to identify missing persons.

Any person who intentionally violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an action for civil damages including punitive damages, equitable relief, including restraint of prohibited acts, restitution of wages or other benefits, reinstatement, costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other appropriate relief.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1942.
Adoption of rules and guidelines.

The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 governing the procedures to be used in the collection, submission, identification, dissemination, analysis, and storage of DNA samples and the DNA record of DNA samples submitted under this subchapter.

The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 governing the methods of obtaining information from the State database and CODIS, and procedures for verification of the identity and authority of the requester.

The Department shall also adopt guidelines to ensure that DNA identification records meet relevant audit standards for forensic DNA laboratories and that the laboratory procedures include the implementation of DNA quality assurance and proficiency testing standards issued by the FBI director.

The rules and guidelines required by this section shall be adopted on or before December 1, 1998.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1943.
Responsibility of Department of Public Safety.

The Department shall be responsible for establishing and maintaining the State DNA database and State DNA data bank as established by this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1944.
Limitation of liability for collection of DNA samples.

No civil or criminal liability shall attach to any person authorized to withdraw blood as a result of the act of collecting DNA samples under this subchapter, provided the DNA samples are collected according to recognized medical procedures. However, no person shall be relieved from liability for negligence in withdrawing of a DNA sample.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1945.
Unlawful tampering with DNA samples.

A person who knowingly or intentionally, without lawful authority, tampers or attempts to tamper with a DNA sample shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 1946.
Repealed. 2013, No. 142 (Adj. Sess.), § 93.